Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Secondary Wood Products

154.47-040.
Flexible manufacturing networks.

Three (3) or more secondary wood products businesses may establish a flexible manufacturing network for the purposes deemed appropriate by those businesses upon application to the cabinet, and, if approved, may become eligible for business incentives and priority consideration for state economic development loans and grants.

Information concerning the various secondary wood products requirements of state capital construction and renovation projects shall be maintained by the Finance and Administration Cabinet’s Department for Facilities and Support Services. This information shall be made available to any secondary wood industry business that seeks business with state agencies. Applications of secondary wood products businesses as prescribed in subsection (1) of this section shall be approved or disapproved by the cabinet.

Any business firm that is a member of an approved network as set forth in this section shall be eligible for priority consideration for financial incentives, including loans, grants, and tax credits programs under the authority of the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority as set forth in this chapter.

Nothing contained in this section shall be so construed as waiving standard eligibility requirements and sound business qualifications applicable to any business making an application to the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority for state financial assistance programs under its authority and responsibility.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 224, § 8, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 414, § 19, effective July 15, 1998; 2013, ch. 49, § 4, effective June 25, 2013.

154.47-045.
Procedures for state agencies with respect to capital construction or renovation projects involving secondary wood products — Corporation’s role in bid solicitations. [Repealed.]

154.47-050.
Design, development, use, and sale of Kentucky-made furniture and other wood products by Kentucky Department of Parks.

The Kentucky Department of Parks of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet shall, whenever practicable:

Develop and design Kentucky-made furniture for use in state parks;

Make state parks facilities living showrooms for Kentucky furniture and other wood products; and

Establish retail showrooms where Kentucky-made furniture and other wood products can be displayed for sale to, or order by, park visitors.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 224, § 10, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 48, § 14, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 95, § 35, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 16, § 41, effective June 25, 2009; 2013, ch. 49, § 5, effective June 25, 2013.

154.47-055.
Integrated workforce training program.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS Chapter 151B, the University of Kentucky, Eastern Kentucky University, Morehead State University, and the Kentucky Community and Technical College System in conjunction with the Department of Workforce Investment in the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet may develop an integrated program and curricula for workforce training in the area of secondary wood products manufacturing, including nondegree and degree courses of study.

The integrated workforce training program and the curricula shall be designed in a manner that shall provide postsecondary, nondegree and degree level students with the contemporary skills needed for employment in the secondary wood industry.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 224, § 11, effective July 15, 1994; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 56, effective May 30, 1997; 2013, ch. 49, § 6, effective June 25, 2013.

154.47-060.
Quicksand Wood Utilization Center as hub for industry expansion — Demonstration projects.

The University of Kentucky College of Agriculture may operate the Quicksand Wood Utilization Center, which is located in Breathitt County at the Quicksand Substation of the College of Agriculture of the University of Kentucky, as a hub for the expansion of the secondary wood products industry. The center shall, if utilized as a secondary wood products training center, develop and further workforce training, management skills, technology transfer, and collaborative design and product development mechanisms and processes associated with the secondary wood products industry.

The Quicksand Wood Utilization Center shall serve as a model for the development of additional hubs in other parts of the state.

The cabinet, utilizing facilities of the Quicksand Wood Utilization Center, may conduct demonstration projects at the center, and may provide assistance to rural development organizations by producing building materials, furniture, and other wood products for display and sale at area showrooms and for use by rural development organizations in carrying out approved demonstration projects.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 224, § 12, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 145, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 2013, ch. 49, § 7, effective June 25, 2013.

154.47-065.
Cabinet may establish benchmarks for performance measurement — Monitoring by Division of Forestry.

The cabinet, in cooperation with the Kentucky Division of Forestry, may establish objective benchmarks to measure the performance of Kentucky’s forest industries and secondary wood products manufacturers. Criteria used in establishing the benchmarks may include but are not limited to:

Use of the statistical information commonly provided by governmental agencies, or specific data gathered by authorization of the cabinet;

Comparison of regions and areas within the Commonwealth;

Comparison of Kentucky to other states; and

Inclusion of measures of income, earnings, and employment.

The Division of Forestry, with assistance from the Cabinet for Economic Development, may monitor changes in patterns of wood utilization. Information used in determining changes in wood utilization may include: time-series data on the amount of raw timber shipped out of the state in relation to the amount of timber harvested in the state; time-series data on the number of persons employed in the primary and secondary wood products sectors; and time-series data on value-added measures of Kentucky’s forest products. This information may be collected and maintained and may be used to monitor the development of the state’s secondary wood industry.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 224, § 13, effective July 15, 1994; 2013, ch. 49, § 8, effective June 25, 2013.

154.47-070.
Secondary wood products development fund. [Repealed.]

154.47-075.
Training and assistance programs for forest management and worker safety.

The Kentucky Division of Forestry shall develop and implement a program to provide training and assistance to private woodland owners in best management practices of forest development and sustainability. The training and assistance program shall provide advice and assistance in matters relating to productivity, management priorities, stewardship, planning, timber quality, forest improvement, and proper ecological management.

The Labor Cabinet, the Division of Forestry, and representatives from the University of Kentucky, Eastern Kentucky University, and Morehead State University, shall develop and implement a program to provide training and assistance in the area of worker safety for both the primary and secondary wood industry.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 224, § 18, effective July 15, 1994; 2010, ch. 24, § 205, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 49, § 9, effective June 25, 2013.